Colorado, session 2026A, HB1401.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-13-801, amend
(1)(b) and (5); repeal (2)(d)(II) and (2)(d)(III); and add (3)(c), (3.5)(f), and
(3.5)(g) as follows:
38-13-801. Unclaimed property trust fund - creation - payments
- interest - appropriations - records - rules - repeal.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) (b) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (3.5)
SUBSECTION (2) of this section, the principal of the trust fund shall not be
expended except to pay claims made pursuant to this article 13. Money
constituting the principal of the trust fund is not fiscal year spending of the
state for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution and is
not subject to appropriation by the general assembly.
(2) (d) The following amounts constitute fiscal year spending for
purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution:
(II) Any money that is credited to the adult dental fund created in
section 25.5-5-207 (4) as required by subsection (3) of this section;
(III) Any money that is credited to the housing development grant
fund created in section 24-32-721 (1) as required by subsection (3.5) of this
section;
(3) (c) THIS SUBSECTION (3) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
(3.5) (f) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ONLY
TRANSFER TWO MILLION TWO HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE
UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND TO THE DIVISION OF HOUSING TO BE
DEPOSITED INTO THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT GRANT FUND CREATED IN
SECTION 24-32-721 (1).
(g) THIS SUBSECTION (3.5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
(5) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, on July
1, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer forty-three million dollars from the
unclaimed property trust fund to the general fund.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE CONTRARY, ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
SEVENTY-TWO MILLION EIGHT HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE
UNCLAIMED PROPERTY TRUST FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-32-721, amend
(1.5) as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1401

24-32-721. Colorado affordable housing construction grants and
loans - housing development grant fund - creation - housing assistance
for persons with behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorders
- cash fund - appropriation - report to general assembly - rules -
definitions - repeal.
(1.5) (a) In addition to the other sources of money to be deposited
into the fund that are specified in subsection (1) of this section, the fund
also consists of money transferred by the state treasurer from the unclaimed
property trust fund to the division in accordance with section 38-13-801
(3.5) to supplement existing funds to be expended for any of the purposes
specified in subsection (2)(d) of this section.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (1.5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-207, amend
(4)(a) as follows:
25.5-5-207. Adult dental benefit - adult dental fund - creation -
legislative declaration.
(4) (a) There is hereby created in the state treasury the adult dental
fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", consisting of money
transferred to the fund from the unclaimed property trust fund pursuant to
section 38-13-801 (3) and any money that may be appropriated to the fund
by the general assembly. The money in the fund is subject to annual
appropriation by the general assembly to the state department for the direct
and indirect costs associated with implementing the adult dental benefit
pursuant to section 25.5-5-202 (1)(w).
SECTION 4. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to implement this
act, the appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of health care policy and
financing from the adult dental fund created in section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a),
C.R.S., are decreased as follows:
Executive director's office, general administration
Personal services $178,268
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1401

Health, life, and dental $43,560
Short-term disability $1,120
Paid family and medical leave insurance $1,007
Unfunded liability amortization payments $22,681
Step pay $829
PERA direct distribution $4,091
Workers' compensation $1,312
Operating expenses $9,245
Leased space $12,153
Payments to OIT $44,045
CORE operations $771
General professional services and special projects $88,750
Executive director's office, indirect cost recoveries
Indirect cost assessment $8,504
Medical services premiums
Medical and long-term care services for Medicaid
eligible individuals $63,074,986
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $63,491,322 is appropriated to
the department of health care policy and financing. This appropriation is
from the general fund. To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation as follows:
Executive director's office, general administration
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1401

Personal services $178,268
Health, life, and dental $43,560
Short-term disability $1,120
Paid family and medical leave insurance $1,007
Unfunded liability amortization payments $22,681
Step pay $829
PERA direct distribution $4,091
Workers' compensation $1,312
Operating expenses $9,245
Leased space $12,153
Payments to OIT $44,045
CORE operations $771
General professional services and special projects $88,750
Executive director's office, indirect cost recoveries
Indirect cost assessment $8,504
Medical services premiums
Medical and long-term care services for Medicaid
eligible individuals $63,074,986(M)
(3) (a) If the cash funds appropriation from the adult dental fund
created in section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
health care policy and financing is an amount less than the amount of the
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1401

adjustments required in subsection (1) of this section, the cash funds
appropriation from the adult dental fund is decreased to $0.
(b) Subsection (1) of this section does not require reductions of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if the act does not include an appropriation to the department of
health care policy and financing for use by the executive director's office
for:
(I) Personal services;
(II) Health, life, and dental;
(III) Short-term disability;
(IV) Paid family and medical leave insurance;
(V) Unfunded liability amortization payments;
(VI) Step pay;
(VII) PERA direct distribution;
(VIII) Workers' compensation;
(IX) Operating expenses;
(X) Leased space;
(XI) Payments to OIT;
(XII) CORE operations;
(XIII) General professional services and special projects; and
(XIV) Indirect cost assessment.
(c) If the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year does not include an appropriation to the department of health
care policy and financing for Medical and long-term care services for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1401

Medicaid eligible individuals, then subsection (1) does not require a
reduction of an appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the
2025-26 state fiscal year.
SECTION 5. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Sections 38-13-801 (1)(b), (2)(d)(II), and (2)(d)(III), Colorado
Revised Statutes, amended and repealed in section 1 of this act, and section
25.5-5-207 (4)(a), Colorado Revised Statutes, amended in section 3 of this
act, take effect July 1, 2026.
(3) Section 4 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 4 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1401

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1401